Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.120

Insurance—Cancellation procedure—Suspension of license.

(1) Upon the existence of an effective policy of insurance as required in RCW 22.09.110, the insurance company involved shall be required to give thirty days' advance notice to the department by registered mail or certified mail return receipt requested of any cancellation of the policy. In the event of any cancellation, the department, without hearing, shall immediately suspend the license of such person, and the suspension shall not be removed until satisfactory evidence of the existence of an effective policy of insurance, conditioned as above set out, has been submitted to the department.

[ 1963 c 124 s 12.]